apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="wrze/siyń__n">
  <e>       <p><l>siyń</l>      <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śnia</l>      <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śniowi</l>    <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>siyń</l>      <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śniym</l>     <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śniu</l>      <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śniu</l>      <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>śnie</l>      <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śniōw</l>     <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śniōm</l>     <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śnie</l>      <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śniami</l>    <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śniach</l>    <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śnie</l>      <r>siyń<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="listopad__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owi</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōw</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōm</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ami</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ach</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="lud/zie__n">
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r>zie<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zi</l>        <r>zie<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ziōm</l>      <r>zie<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r>zie<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>źmi</l>       <r>zie<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ziach</l>     <r>zie<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie</l>       <r>zie<s n="n"/><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="strōm/_mandlowy__n">
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mandlowy</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a<b/>mandlowego</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>owi<b/>mandlowymu</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l><b/>mandlowy</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ym<b/>mandlowym</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie<b/>mandlowym</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie<b/>mandlowy</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>y<b/>mandlowe</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōw<b/>mandlowych</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōm<b/>mandlowym</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y<b/>mandlowe</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ami<b/>mandlowymi</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ach<b/>mandlowych</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y<b/>mandlowe</l><r><b/>mandlowy<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="ludzie">          <i>lud</i><par n="lud/zie__n"/></e>
<e lm="listopad">        <i>listopad</i><par n="listopad__n"/></e>
<e lm="wrzesiyń">        <i>wrze</i><par n="wrze/siyń__n"/></e>
<e lm="miynsiyń">        <i>miyn</i><par n="wrze/siyń__n"/></e>
<e lm="strōm mandlowy">  <i>strōm</i><par n="strōm/_mandlowy__n"/></e>
